Utah statutes.
58-11a-103.   Education and enforcement fund.

(1)  There is created a restricted special revenue fund known as the "Barber, Cosmetologist/Barber, Esthetician, Electrologist, and Nail Technician Education and Enforcement Fund."

(2)  The fund consists of money from administrative penalties collected pursuant to this chapter.

(3)  The fund shall earn interest and all interest earned on fund money shall be deposited into the fund.

(4)  The director may, with concurrence of the board, make distributions from the fund for the following purposes:

(a)  education and training of licensees under this chapter;

(b)  education and training of the public or other interested persons in matters concerning the laws governing the practices licensed under this chapter; and

(c)  enforcement of this chapter by:

(i)  investigating unprofessional or unlawful conduct; and

(ii)  providing legal representation to the division when the division takes legal action against a person engaging in unprofessional or unlawful conduct.

(5)  The division shall report annually to the appropriate appropriations subcommittee of the Legislature concerning the fund.



Amended by Chapter 209, 2007 General Session

